Tennessee, session 114, HB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3103(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "two (2) weeks" and substituting "three (3) weeks".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1179
003104
- 1 -